Missouri, session 2026, SB1360.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.580, to read as
follows:
537.580. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Civil Liability for Employers Hiring Ex-
Offenders Act".
2. A cause of action shall not be brought against an
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third
party for hiring an employee or independent contractor who
has been convicted of an offense, unless such employee or
independent contractor has been convicted of an offense
contained in section 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.027,
565.050, 565.052, 565.054, 565.072, 565.073, 565.074,
565.090, 565.110, 565.115, 565.120, 565.153, 565.156,
565.225, 565.300, 566.030, 566.031, 566.032, 566.034,
566.060, 566.061, 566.062, 566.064, 566.067, 566.068,
566.069, 566.071, 566.083, 566.086, 566.100, 566.101,
566.103, 566.111, 566.115, 566.145, 566.151, 566.153,
566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, 566.215,
568.030, 568.045, 568.060, 568.065, 568.175, 569.040,

SB 1360 2
569.160, 570.023, 570.025, 570.030 when punished as a class
A, B, or C felony, 570.145 when punished as a class A or B
felony, 570.223 when punished as a class B or C felony,
571.020, 571.030, 571.070, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035,
573.037, 573.200, 573.205, 574.070, 574.080, 574.115,
575.030, 575.150, 575.153, 575.155, 575.157, 575.200 when
punished as a class A felony, 575.210, 575.230 when punished
as a class B felony, 575.240 when punished as a class B
felony, 576.070, 576.080, 577.010, 577.013, 577.078,
577.703, 577.706, 579.065, or 579.068 when punished as a
class A or B felony.
3. In an action for negligent hiring against an
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third
party for acts of an employee or independent contractor that
is based on a theory of liability other than that described
in subsection 2 of this section, the fact that the employee
or independent contractor was convicted of a nonviolent,
nonsexual offense before the employee or independent
contractor's employment or contractual obligation with the
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or other third
party shall be inadmissible as evidence.
4. The provisions of this section shall not preclude
any existing cause of action for failure of an employer to
provide adequate supervision of an employee or independent
contractor, except that the fact the employee or independent
contractor has been convicted of a nonviolent, nonsexual
offense may be admissible as evidence in such action only if
the employer:
(1) Knew of the conviction or was grossly negligent in
the failure to know of the conviction; and
(2) The conviction was directly related to the nature
of the employee's or independent contractor's work and the

SB 1360 3
conduct that gave rise to the alleged injury that is the
basis of the action.
5. The protections in this section provided to an
employer, general contractor, premises owner, or third party
do not apply in an action concerning:
(1) The misuse of funds or property of a person other
than the employer, general contractor, premises owner, or
third party by an employee or independent contractor if, on
the date the employee or independent contractor was hired,
the employee or independent contractor had been convicted of
an offense that includes fraud or the misuse of funds or
property as an element, and it was foreseeable that the
position for which the employee or independent contractor
was hired would involve discharging a fiduciary
responsibility in the management of the funds or property;
(2) The misappropriation of funds by an employee or
independent contractor if the employee or independent
contractor was hired as an attorney and, on the date the
employee or independent contractor was hired, the employee
or independent contractor had been convicted of an offense
that includes fraud or the misuse of funds or property as an
element; or
(3) A violent offense or an improper use of excessive
force by an employee or independent contractor if the
employee or independent contractor was hired to serve as a
law enforcement officer or security guard.
6. The provisions of this section shall not be
interpreted as implying a cause of action exists for
negligent hiring of an individual convicted of an offense in
situations not covered by this section.
✓